Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2429.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-2 of the General Laws entitled "Duties of Utilities and Carriers"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-2-29. Duty to maintain customer service operations within the state.
Every public utility operated and licensed to provide services to the residents and
businesses within the state under chapter 1 of title 39, shall maintain a customer service operation
physically located within the state which is reasonably staffed to meet the expectations of the
public. The customer service operation shall be available to answer customer inquiries, meet with
customers, accept payment of bills, and perform any other services that the public utilities
commission may direct from time to time.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004968
========